Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB408.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Property." A property listed under section 2.Section 2. Duty of department.The department shall develop a plan, in accordance with section 3, for the divestiture of the following properties:(1) White Haven Center at 827 Oley Valley Road, White Haven, PA 18661.(2) Hamburg Center at 3560 Old Route 22, Hamburg, PA 19526.123456789101112131415161718 (3) Polk Center at South 2nd Street, Polk, PA 16342.Section 3. Requirements of plan.The plan under section 2 shall include the following information:(1) A three-year plan to transfer each property from the Commonwealth to a buyer.(2) Details regarding any discussions that have already taken place between the Commonwealth and any potential buyer of a property, including the result of those conversations.(3) Details regarding the:(i) yearly costs for upkeep of each property from the date the centers were closed; and(ii) expected yearly costs for upkeep of each property through 2035 if the properties are not sold.(4) The costs associated with demolition of buildings located at each property.(5) The costs associated with refurbishing buildings not structurally sound or safe to inhabit.Section 4. Submission of plan.Within six months of the effective date of this section, the department shall submit the plan developed under section 2 to the following:(1) The State Government Committee of the Senate.(2) The State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0408PN0363 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627